Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-5,221
State elevator inspector; qualifications; deputy inspectors; employment; qualifications.

(1) The State Fire Marshal shall employ a state elevator inspector who shall work under the direct supervision of the State Fire Marshal or the State Fire Marshal's designee.

(2) The person so employed shall be qualified by (a) not less than five years' experience in the installation, maintenance, and repair of elevators as determined by the State Fire Marshal, (b) certification as a qualified elevator inspector by an association accredited by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers, or (c) not less than five years' journeyman experience in elevator installation, maintenance, and inspection as determined by the State Fire Marshal and shall be familiar with the inspection process and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the Conveyance Safety Act.

(3) The State Fire Marshal may employ deputy inspectors possessing the same qualifications as the state elevator inspector as necessary to carry out the Conveyance Safety Act.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. IV, art. IV, § 14, p. 561;

C.S.1922, § 7695;

C.S.1929, § 48-414;

R.S.1943, § 48-418;

Laws 1965, c. 283, § 1, p. 810;

Laws 1967, c. 297, § 1, p. 810;

Laws 1973, LB 320, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 659, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 36, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 126;

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 35;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 48-418;

Laws 2007, LB265, § 27;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2512.01;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 57;

Laws 2025, LB415, § 25.